Utah statutes.
53-11-106.   Board meetings and hearings -- Quorum.

(1)  The board shall meet at the call of the chair, but not less often than once each quarter.

(2)  A quorum consists of three members, but the quorum shall include one peace officer, one person licensed under this chapter and one public member.

(3)  If a member has three or more unexcused absences within a 12-month period, the commissioner shall determine if that board member should be released from board duties.

